Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REDUCTION IN APPROPRIATIONS FOR UNFILLED POSITIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Reduction required. new text end new text begin The general fund and nongeneral fund appropriations to an agency for agency operations for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, are reduced by the amount for salary and benefits savings that results from any positions that have not been filled within 180 days of the posting of the position. This section applies only to positions that are posted in fiscal years 2023, 2024, and 2025. Reductions made under this subdivision must be reflected as reductions in agency base budgets for fiscal years 2026 and 2027. This section does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) any position that requires law enforcement training; or new text end new text begin (2) any public safety position. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin The commissioner of management and budget must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and the house of representatives finance committees regarding the amount of reductions in spending by each agency under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end